Hawaii statutes.
[§482-27]
Records. The director shall maintain a record of all marks registered or
renewed under this part, including a record of all marks recorded pursuant to
section 482-26. [L 2001, c 15, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next